Utah statutes.
63K-5-201.   Notice of claim requirements.

(1)  Any claim against an emergency responder or the responder's employer shall be treated for the purpose of a notice of claim as a claim against the state.

(2)  The person making the claim shall comply with:

(a)  Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah; and

(b)  any notice of claim requirements of the state where the emergency responder resides or is employed as an emergency responder.

(3)  The person filing the claim shall provide a copy of the notice of claim with the Idaho secretary of state if the claim is filed in Utah, or with the Utah attorney general if the claim is filed in Idaho.

